Wisconsin, session 2025, AB18.
do enact as follows:AB18,14Section 1. 27.01 (9) (bg) of the statutes is created to read:AB18,2,6127.01 (9) (bg) Annual vehicle admission receipt fee waiver; 4th graders. The 2department shall waive the fee, including the issuing fee, imposed under sub. (7) for 3an annual vehicle admission receipt for any vehicle, except a motor bus, that has 4Wisconsin registration plates and that is owned by a person who produces evidence 5that he or she is the owner and is the parent or guardian of a child who possesses a 6valid Every Kid Outdoors pass issued by the U.S. National Park Service.AB18,27Section 2. 27.01 (9) (bn) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB18,2,9827.01 (9) (bn) (title) Annual vehicle admission receipt fee waiver; service 9members.AB18,2,1010